Hawaii statutes.
§383-174 Computations. Computations
required by section 383-168(4) shall be made by the director, in accordance
with regulations prescribed by the United States Secretary of Labor. [L 1971, c
187, pt of §13; am L 1982, c 58, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next